California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(15) “Owner” means the owner, part owner, or lessee of a horse. An interest only in the earnings of a horse does not constitute ownership.

(16) “Parimutuel employee” means a person hired to work for the company licensed to accept wagers on the outcome of a horse race. A “parimutuel employee” includes totalizer technicians and those persons employed by a licensed totalizer company.

(17) “Pony rider” means a person riding a pony horse on training or race days.

(18) “Safety personnel” means a person hired to provide security, medical services, or emergency services within a racing inclosure.

(19) “Special event personnel” means a person who works for the Breeders’ Cup World Championships when the event is held at a board-licensed racing facility or a person who is otherwise hired for a temporary racing event.

(20) “Stable agent”
 means a person who is the authorized representative of a stable or an owner that may act on their behalf in managing the schedule of races.

(21) “Stable foreman” means a person in charge of daily operations in a racing stable.

(22) “Stableworker” means a person employed at the operation of a stable at a board-licensed inclosure that is not more specifically described by another classification. This classification includes those who feed, groom, exercise, train, and conduct general care of horses.

(23) “Stakeholder representative” means a person whose constituents are located within a licensed inclosure. This includes clergy, union representatives, and representatives from state-recognized organizations of trainers or horsepersons.

(24) “Trainer” means a
 person who has passed the board’s trainer’s examination and otherwise meets the board’s qualifications for licensure as established pursuant to regulation.

(25) “Vendor or vendor employee” means a person who provides goods or services related to horse racing at a facility licensed by the board. A “vendor” includes persons who access the licensed inclosure for the purpose of delivering equine supplies or transporting equines and maintenance workers, media, food service staff, jockey room staff, and stable staff.

(26) “Veterinarian” means a California-licensed veterinarian.

(27) “Veterinarian assistant” means a person employed by a board-licensed veterinarian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 16.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19521.

(a) A license issued pursuant to this article shall be issued for a period not to exceed three years, which the board may, by regulation, establish. The board may establish a license fee schedule consistent with the different period for which the licenses may be granted.

(b) The license shall be valid at all horse racing meetings in this state during the period for which it is issued, unless it is suspended or revoked before the expiration of the period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 354, Sec. 3.   (AB 1768)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19522.

(a) The board shall also set forth requirements for the position of satellite facility supervisor for all satellite wagering facilities operated by the state or on public land. The satellite facility supervisor shall, among other things, monitor the performance of licensees at the facilities.

(b) A fair satellite facility generating less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) annually in total handle may elect not to be subject to the requirements of this section if the board of directors of the fair satellite facility, after a public hearing, deems those requirements to be not economically feasible and
 all of the following requirements are met:

(1) Thirty days prior to the public hearing, the fair board notifies the board in writing of its intention to take the action described in this subdivision.

(2) The fair satellite facility shall continue to abide by all laws and regulations pertaining to the operation of a satellite facility, including the responsibilities of the position of satellite facility supervisor.

(3) Notice of the fair board’s action shall be provided to the board within 10 days of approval by the fair board. Notice shall include the name and contact information of the individual or individuals assuming the responsibilities of the position of satellite facility supervisor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.   (AB 270)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19523.

The board may, at any time, require the removal of any racing official or employee in any case where it has reason to believe that the official or employee has been guilty of any dishonest practice in connection with horse racing, has failed to comply with any condition of the licensee’s license, or has violated any law or any rule or regulation of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19525.

(a) For purposes of this section, “equine” means a horse of any breed used for racing or showing, including prospective racehorses, breeding prospects, stallions, stallion seasons, broodmares, yearlings, or weanlings, or any interest therein.

(b) Any sale, purchase, or transfer of an equine shall be both of the following:

(1) Accompanied by a written bill of sale or acknowledgment of purchase setting forth the purchase price.

(2) Signed by both the purchaser and the seller or their duly authorized agents or, in a transaction solely relating to a season or fractional interest in a stallion, signed by the syndicate
 manager or stallion manager.

(c) When a transaction described in subdivision (b) is accomplished through a public auction, the bill of sale requirement may be satisfied by the issuance of an auction receipt generated by the auction house and signed by the purchaser or an agent whom the purchaser has authorized.

(d) It is unlawful for a person to act as a “dual agent,” which is hereby defined as a person acting as an agent for both the purchaser and the seller, in a transaction involving the sale, purchase, or transfer of an interest in an equine without the prior knowledge of both the purchaser and seller, and the written consent of both the purchaser and seller.

(e) It is unlawful for a person acting as an agent for either a purchaser or a seller or acting as a dual agent in a transaction involving the sale,
 purchase, or transfer of an equine to receive in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) worth of compensation, fees, gratuities, or other items of value, related directly or indirectly to that transaction, from an individual or entity, including any consigner involved in the transaction, other than the agent’s principal, unless both of the following occur:

(1) The agent receiving the item of value and the individual or entity giving the item of value disclose the transfer of that item of value in writing to the principal or principals for whom the agent is acting.

(2) Each principal for whom the agent is acting consents thereto in writing.

(f) Any person acting as an agent for a purchaser or seller or acting as a dual agent in a transaction involving the sale, purchase, or transfer of an equine shall, upon request by his or her principal
 or principals, provide to the requesters copies of all financial records in the possession or control of the agent pertaining to the transaction. For purposes of this subdivision, financial records shall not include the agent’s or owner’s work product used to internally evaluate the equine.

(g) Any person injured by a violation of this section shall recover treble damages from persons or entities violating this section.

(h) No contract or agreement for payment of a commission, fee, gratuity, or any other form of compensation in connection with any sale, purchase, or transfer of an equine shall be enforceable by way of an action or defense unless both of the following occur:

(1) The contract or agreement is in writing and is signed by the party against whom enforcement is sought.

(2) The recipient of the compensation provides a written bill of sale or auction receipt for the transaction in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and subdivision (c) respectively.

(i) The board may suspend or revoke the license of any person who violates this section.

(j) Subdivisions (g) and (h) shall not apply to the acts or omissions of an entity or individual engaged in conducting a public auction of an equine, or the entity or individual’s employees or agents, if both of the following conditions apply:

(1) The acts or omissions of the entity, individual, employee, or agent are in furtherance of or pursuant to the conduct of the public auction of an equine.

(2) The entity
 or individual is appropriately licensed or authorized to conduct that specific public auction by the California Horse Racing Board and any other governmental entity whose permission or authorization is required to conduct the auction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   (SB 254)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19526.

(a) Each trainer shall keep accurate payroll records, showing the name, address, social security number, work classification, straight time and overtime hours worked each day and week, paid to each of his or her employees.

(b) The payroll records enumerated under subdivision (a) shall be available for inspection at all reasonable hours at the principal office of the trainer on the following basis:

(1) A copy of an employee’s payroll record shall be made available for inspection or furnished to the employee or his or her authorized representative upon request.

(2) A copy of all payroll records enumerated in subdivision (a) shall be made available for inspection or furnished upon request to the board and the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of the Department of Industrial Relations.

(3) On or before January 31 of each year, each trainer shall provide copies of federal W-2 and 1099 tax forms for his or her backstretch employees for the previous calendar year to the administrator of the pension fund for backstretch employees.

(c) The payroll records described in this section shall be on forms provided by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement or shall contain the same information as the forms provided by the division.

(d) A trainer shall make the records enumerated in subdivision (a) available to an employee or his or her authorized representative within 10 days after receipt of a written request.

(e) The trainer shall inform the board of the location of the records enumerated under subdivision (a), including the street address, city and county, and shall, within five working days, provide a notice of a change of location and address.

(f) In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, any trainer who fails to provide access to the records enumerated in subdivision (a) to the board, the employee or his or her authorized representative, the administrator of the pension or welfare funds, or to the Division of Labor Standards enforcement as required by law shall be subject to suspension of his or her license.

(g) Except for trainers covered by an operative collective bargaining agreement pursuant to Section 19613.7, the board may require, as a condition of issuing or renewing a trainer’s license, that the trainer submit a declaration that they have maintained true and correct payroll records and have complied with the requirements of the Labor Code and applicable wage orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(h) The Labor Commissioner shall establish and maintain a program to audit the payroll records of trainers who are not parties to a collective bargaining agreement entered pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 19455) and who operate in California for 90 or more racing days in a calendar year, in a manner to ensure that every subject licensee is audited at least once prior to January 1, 2006. Evidence of substantial noncompliance with the Labor Code and applicable wage orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission shall be referred by the board to the Labor Commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 198, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.6. Interstate Compact on Horse Racing Occupational Licensing [19527. - 19528.]

19527.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Association of Racing Commissioners International has proposed a compact providing for the licensure of individuals involved in the horse racing industry.

(b) The intent of this compact is to preclude the necessity of individual owners, trainers, backstretch employees, and other race track personnel from having to be separately licensed in each state in which they may conduct business.

(c) This compact would provide for an individual to be licensed by the compact committee created therein, and thus be able to practice his or her profession in all states that are members of the compact.

(d) The purpose of the compact is to:

(1) Establish uniform requirements among the party states for the licensing of participants in live horse racing with parimutuel wagering, and ensure that all participants who are licensed pursuant to this compact meet a uniform minimum standard of honesty and integrity.

(2) Facilitate the growth of the horse racing industry in each party state and nationwide by simplifying the licensing process for participants in the live racing industry, and reduce the duplicative and costly process of separate licensing by the applicable regulatory agency in each state.

(3) Authorize the California Horse Racing Board to participate in this compact.

(4) Provide for participation in this compact by officials of the party states, and permit those officials, through the compact committee established by the compact, to enter into contracts with governmental agencies and nongovernmental persons and entities to carry out the purposes of this compact.

(5) Establish the compact committee created by this compact as an interstate governmental entity duly authorized to request and receive criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation, other federal law enforcement agencies, and state and local law enforcement agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 935, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19528.

The California Horse Racing Board is hereby authorized to enter into the interstate compact identified in Section 19527 for the purposes described therein, provided that this state’s participation in this compact does not result in the diminution of applicable existing standards established for licensure in California with regard to an applicant’s criminal history and does not prevent the enforcement of any state law or regulation affecting any licensee. The California Horse Racing Board’s entry into the interstate compact identified in Section 19527 shall not relieve any individual or entity of its duty to obtain any license or pay any fee otherwise required by this chapter. An individual designated by the California Horse Racing Board shall be responsible for representing California in conjunction with the administration of the compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 935, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Racing Days Generally [19530. - 19535.]

19530.

(a) The board shall have the authority to allocate racing weeks to an applicant or applicants pursuant to the provisions of this article and Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 19540) and to specify such racing days, dates, and hours for horse racing meetings as will be in the public interest, and will subserve the purposes of this chapter. The decision of the board as to those
 racing days, dates, and hours shall be subject to change, limitation, restriction, or reallocation only by the board. No municipality or county shall adopt or enforce any ordinance or regulation that has or may have the effect of directly or indirectly regulating, limiting, restricting, or reallocating the racing days and dates of horse racing meetings.

(b) The board may, at any time, change, limit, restrict, or reallocate racing weeks, days, or dates that are allocated pursuant to this section regardless of whether a condition giving rise to that action is foreseen at the time of allocation or whether a license is issued to conduct a horse racing meeting during an allocated week, day, or date. The board’s exercise of authority pursuant to this subdivision is not a revocation subject to the proceedings required by Section
 19461, regardless of any effect on a license issued under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 22, Sec. 2.   (SB 469)   Effective June 26, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19530.5.

For the purposes of this article there shall be three geographical zones which shall be designated (a) the “southern zone,” which shall consist of the Counties of Imperial, Orange, Riverside, and San Diego; (b) the “central zone,” which shall consist of the Counties of Kern, Los Angeles, San Bernardino, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, and Ventura; and (c) the “northern zone,” which shall consist of the remaining counties in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1759.)
-------------------------------------------

19531.

(a) The board shall make allocations of racing weeks, including simultaneous racing between zones, as it deems appropriate. The maximum number of racing weeks that may be allocated for horse racing other than at fairs, shall be as follows:

(1) For thoroughbred racing: 44 weeks per year in the northern zone; and 49 weeks per year in the combined central and southern zones.

(2) For harness racing: 25 weeks per year in the northern zone.

(3) For quarter horse racing: 25 weeks per year in the northern zone.

(4) For harness racing and quarter horse racing: a total of 77 weeks per year in the combined central and southern zones.

(b) In its written application for a license, an applicant shall state the time of day, consistent with this chapter, during which it will conduct its racing meeting, and particularly the first race starting time for the various racing days. After receiving a license, a licensee shall not change the first race starting time without securing prior approval of the board.

(c) Notwithstanding this section or any other provision in this chapter, the following provisions apply:

(1) From the weeks available in the combined central and southern zones pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall allocate a
 minimum of seven weeks per year to a thoroughbred racing association to conduct thoroughbred racing at a racetrack that was used to conduct a thoroughbred race meeting in the southern zone prior to 2012.

(2) The board shall not allocate dates to a thoroughbred association in the central zone for the purpose of conducting racing if a thoroughbred racing association is conducting racing in the southern zone on the same date during daytime hours.

(3) From the weeks available in the combined central and southern zones pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall allocate a minimum of 25 weeks per year to a thoroughbred racing association to conduct thoroughbred racing at a racetrack that was used to conduct a thoroughbred race meeting in the central zone prior to 2012.

(4) The board shall not allocate dates to a thoroughbred association in the southern zone for the purpose of conducting racing if a thoroughbred racing association is conducting racing in the central zone on the same date during daytime hours.

(5) From the weeks available in the combined central and southern zones pursuant to subdivision (a), the board may allocate a maximum of five weeks per year to a thoroughbred racing association to conduct thoroughbred racing at a racetrack in the southern zone that was not used to conduct a thoroughbred race meeting in the southern zone prior to 2012.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if the board does not license a thoroughbred race meeting to be conducted by
 a racing association at a racetrack located in the cities of Berkeley and Albany after July 1, 2024, a thoroughbred racing association, or racing fair, in the southern or central zone licensed by the board to conduct a thoroughbred race meeting or fair meeting
 shall, during racing weeks not allocated by the board for a race meeting in the northern zone, be deemed to be operating in the northern zone for the purpose of conducting all permissible forms of wagering in the northern zone pursuant to this chapter and making and receiving required distributions from those wagers in accordance with this chapter.

(2) Required distributions described in paragraph (1) shall be made in accordance with the requirements applicable to a racing association in the northern zone and any consent or approval rights shall be exercised by the appropriate racing association or racing fair in the central or southern zone conducting racing.

(3) The amounts generated for purses and commissions pursuant to this subdivision shall be used to pay simulcast
 funding requirements and board support that the thoroughbred racing associations and racing fair in the central or southern zone are required to make under Section 19616.51. Any remaining funds after those payments are made shall be distributed to each thoroughbred racing association and racing fair in the central and southern zones proportionally based on their respective handle in the central and southern zones during the previous fiscal year and that money shall be divided between purses and commissions in the same relative proportion as was generated in the central and southern zones during the previous fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 12.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19531.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, the board shall not allocate racing dates to a thoroughbred racing association in the central or southern zone for the purpose of conducting thoroughbred racing during daytime or nighttime hours if a fair racing association is conducting racing in
 either zone on the same dates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 50, Sec. 2.   (SB 721)   Effective June 25, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19532.

(a) Any association licensed to conduct thoroughbred racing in the northern zone may receive no more than 35 weeks of that racing.

(b) Any association licensed to conduct thoroughbred racing in the central zone may receive no more than 17 weeks of that racing, except that any association which conducts a split meeting may receive up to 20 weeks of that racing. No more than one such split meeting may be licensed in any one year.

(c) This section and Section 19531 shall not operate to deprive any association of any weeks of racing granted during 1980.

(d) This section and Section 19531 shall not operate to deprive the California State Fair and Exposition of any weeks of racing granted during the previous calendar year, and the board may continue to allocate those weeks of racing to the California Exposition and State Fair or any lessee thereof.

(e) Nothing in subdivision (d) is a limitation on the board allocating racing weeks to any private racing association as a lessee of the California Exposition and State Fair racetrack facility pursuant to Sections 19531 and 19532.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19533.

(a) Any license granted to an association other than a fair shall be only for one type of racing, thoroughbred, harness, or quarter horse racing as the case may be, except that the board may authorize the entering of thoroughbred and Appaloosa horses in quarter horse races at a distance not exceeding five furlongs at quarter horse meetings, mixed breed meetings, and fair meetings. If the board authorizes the entering of thoroughbred or Appaloosa horses in quarter horse races, the following conditions shall be met:

(1) Any race written for participation by quarter horses, Appaloosas, and thoroughbreds shall be written as quarter horse preferred.

(2) The number of races written as quarter horse preferred at a distance exceeding 870 yards shall not exceed more than three races per program without the consent of the quarter horse horsemen’s organization contracting with the association.

(3) More than one-half of the races on any program shall be for quarter horses at a distance not to exceed 550 yards, unless the consent of the quarter horse horsemen’s organization is received.

(4) Mixed races with Appaloosa and quarter horses may only be written with the consent of the quarter horse horsemen’s organization contracting with the association.

(5) Thoroughbreds shall constitute less than half the number of horses in these races although an exception may be granted on a race-to-race basis with the consent of the quarter horse horsemen’s organization contracting with the association.

(b) The association that conducts the meeting shall pay to a thoroughbred trainers’ organization an amount for a pension plan for backstretch personnel to be administered by that trainers’ organization equivalent to 1 percent of the amount available to thoroughbred horses for purses. The remainder of the portion shall be distributed as purses. Any redistributable money paid to the board pursuant to Section 19641, which is paid to a welfare fund established by a horsemen’s organization from races with both thoroughbred and quarter horses, shall be divided pro rata between the two welfare funds based on the number of thoroughbreds and quarter horses in the race.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any association licensed to conduct quarter horse racing may apply to the board for, and the board shall grant, authority to conduct thoroughbred racing as part of its racing program if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The thoroughbred races are for a claiming price of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and at a distance of four and one-half furlongs or less. The races may not be stakes, allowance races, or maiden allowance races.

(B) More than one-half of the races on any program shall be for quarter horses at a distance not to exceed 550 yards, unless the consent of the quarter horse horsemen’s organization is received.

(C) The consent of the quarter horse horsemen’s organization contracting with the association is obtained with respect to the inclusion of thoroughbred racing.

(2) The quarter horse racing association conducting thoroughbred racing pursuant to this subdivision shall pay to a quarter horse horsemen’s organization the amount specified in subdivision (e) of Section 19613, and an amount for a pension plan for backstretch personnel to be administered by a thoroughbred trainers’ organization equivalent to 1 percent of the amount available to thoroughbred horses for purses. The remainder of the portion shall be distributed as purses. The quarter horse racing association shall also deduct the appropriate amount to comply with subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2 for distribution to the thoroughbred official registering agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 368, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19533.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19533, the board may authorize the following mixed breed racing:

(1) An association licensed to conduct a quarter horse meeting to include Appaloosa races and Arabian races with the consent of the quarter horse horsemen’s organization contracting with the association with respect to the conduct of the racing meeting.

(2) A race between a quarter horse and a thoroughbred horse at a thoroughbred meeting with the consent of the thoroughbred horsemen’s organization contracting with the association with respect to the conduct of the racing meeting.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 19533, an association licensed to conduct quarter horse racing or a fair may conduct races that include paint horses racing with quarter horses or Appaloosa horses in the same race. When paint horses race with quarter horses, the consent of the organization that represents quarter horse horsemen and horsewomen shall first be obtained. A quarter horse association may write a race for paint horses only to replace an Appaloosa or Arabian race without increasing the average number of races run per race day with the consent of the organization representing the quarter horsemen and horsewomen.

(c) A quarter horse race with seven or more entries shall not be replaced by a race that includes paint horses, without the consent of the organization that represents quarter
 horse horsemen and horsewomen.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a quarter horse racing association or fair conducting barrel racing, paint horse racing, show jump racing, or steeplechase racing shall pay to the quarter horsemen’s organization the amount specified in Section 19613 for purposes of representing the horsemen and horsewomen conducting these races.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 19533, the board may authorize an association licensed to conduct a thoroughbred race meeting to include up to six nonthoroughbred races per calendar year with the consent of the organization representing thoroughbred horsemen and horsewomen, provided, however, that a nonthoroughbred race shall not be held when a fair in the northern zone is conducting a race meeting without that fair’s
 consent. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 19617.8, amounts deducted and distributed pursuant to this chapter from wagering on nonthoroughbred races authorized pursuant to this section shall be deducted and distributed as if the wagers were placed on a thoroughbred race.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (AB 558)   Effective March 29, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19533.6.

Notwithstanding Section 19533, the board may authorize any racing association licensed to conduct a live quarter horse racing meeting to also conduct mule racing at that racing meeting, subject to the following conditions:

(a) Mule races may only be conducted when a fair is not licensed to conduct live races with parimutuel wagering.

(b) The consent of the quarter horse horsemen’s organization contracting with the association shall be obtained with respect to the inclusion of mule racing.

(c) The majority of the races conducted on any given racing day shall be quarter horse races.

(d) A quarter horse association may conduct mule races provided that the total number of Arabian and mule races run in a year do not exceed the total number of Arabian races run in the state in 2001.

(e) An Arabian race with seven or more entries shall not be replaced by mule race, without the consent of the organization that represents Arabian horsemen and horsewomen.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 924, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19535.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, at the time the board allocates racing weeks, it shall determine the number of useable stalls that each association or fair shall make available and maintain in order to conduct the racing meeting. The minimum number of stalls may be at the site of the racing meeting or at board-approved offsite locations.

(b) With respect to racing meetings conducted in the northern zone, the association or fair conducting the meeting shall provide all stabling required by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) without cost to participating horsemen. Offsite stabling shall be at a board approved facility or facilities selected by the association or fair, with the agreement of the organization representing horsemen participating at the meeting. If there is a
 disagreement between the association or fair and the organization representing the majority of horsemen participating at the meeting with respect to the selection of offsite stabling facilities, the board, at the request of the association or fair or the organization representing the majority of horsemen participating at the meeting, shall promptly determine the board-approved facility or facilities at which offsite stabling shall be made available. The organization representing horsemen participating at the meeting and the association or fair shall mutually agree on the criteria and selection of horses that may use stalls required pursuant to this section.
 Northern zone racing associations or fairs may provide, subject to the availability of funds pursuant to Sections 19607, 19607.1, 19607.2, and 19607.3, at the option of the horse owner, vanning of participating racehorses from any board-approved offsite stabling facility.

(c) (1) With respect to racing meetings conducted in the central or southern zones, all costs associated with the maintenance of the useable stalls for the racing meeting shall be borne by the association or fair conducting the meeting, and, with respect to useable stalls at an offsite location, the association or fair may be required, by order of the board, to bear the costs of vanning from the offsite location to the racing meeting. However, with respect to any racing association in the central or southern zone that conducted a racing meeting in
 1986, if the number of useable stalls made available onsite by a racing association during a racing meeting is less than 95 percent of the number of useable stalls made available onsite by that racing association during its 1986 racing meeting, the racing association shall reimburse the facility providing offsite stabling for the difference in cost between the actual number of useable stalls made available and 95 percent of the useable stalls made available in 1986.

(2) The racing association shall, in addition, reimburse the owner for vanning to the onsite location with respect to those horses stabled at an offsite location necessitated by the failure of a racing association to maintain 95 percent of the
 useable stalls made available by that racing association during its 1986 racing meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   (SB 732)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Fairs and Expositions [19540. - 19549.17.]

19540.

In order to encourage and develop the racing of all horses in California, regardless of breed, whenever a fair conducts a program of horse races on which there is parimutuel wagering, the fair, so far as practicable, shall provide a program of racing that includes thoroughbred racing, quarter horse racing, Arabian racing, and Appaloosa racing, if a sufficient number of horses is available to provide competition in one or more races.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 505, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19542.

Notwithstanding any other law, fairs that conduct live horse racing meetings in the northern zone may allow a joint powers authority to administer and distribute purses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 7.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19546.

(a) In order to encourage and develop the racing of all horses in California, regardless of breed, whenever a fair conducts a program of parimutuel wagering, it may provide a program of mixed breed racing that includes thoroughbred racing, harness racing, quarter horse racing, Arabian racing, paint racing, Appaloosa racing, steeplechase races, barrel races, and show jumping races.

(b) All recognized breeds of horses may compete in barrel races, show jumping races, and steeplechase races. Parimutuel wagering may be conducted on barrel races, show jumping races, and steeplechase races at any public or private facility that has been approved and licensed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19547.

Notwithstanding Section 19490, no deposit shall be required for any horse racing meeting conducted by a fair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 8.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19548.

Except as provided in this chapter, no license, tax, or fee shall be assessed against or collected from any fair which, directly and not through any private person, conducts a horse racing meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.

Except as provided in Section 19549.1, the maximum number of racing weeks that may be allocated to a fair shall be four weeks each year. The board shall take public testimony and make all determinations on the allocation of racing dates during a public hearing. All discussions of allocating racing dates by the board or its subcommittees shall be conducted during a public hearing. Nothing in this section diminishes the authority of the board to establish racing dates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.1.

Notwithstanding Sections 19533 and 19549 or any other provision of this chapter, the board may allocate horse racing days for mixed breed meetings and combined fair horse racing meetings pursuant to Section 4058 of the Food and Agricultural Code. Days may not be allocated for a mixed breed meeting or a combined fair horse racing meeting during the month of June at the California Exposition and State Fair if a standardbred meeting is being conducted at that facility during the month of June.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 225, Sec. 1.   (SB 1418)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.2.

From the weeks available for harness and quarter horse racing pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 19531, the board may allocate a maximum of 12 weeks of harness racing to the 22nd District Agricultural Association to be conducted on the 22nd District Agricultural Association grounds. The racing shall be conducted by a person other than the 22nd District Agricultural Association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 428, Sec. 4.   (AB 1074)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.4.

Notwithstanding Section 19414.5, the board may allocate racing weeks consisting of fewer than five days to an association conducting harness or quarter horse racing meetings if the association and the organization representing the horsemen participating in the meeting agree to the allocation.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 273, Sec. 2) by Stats. 1991, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.5.   Effective September 19, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.6.

Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 19531 and Sections 19540, 19546, and 19549, the board may allocate additional weeks of harness racing to the California Exposition and State Fair in Sacramento or its lessee, to be raced at the California Exposition and State Fair in Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 428, Sec. 5.   (AB 1074)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.7.

Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 19531 and Section 19549, the board may allocate additional weeks of quarter horse racing to a lessee of the California Exposition and State Fair in Sacramento to be raced at the California Exposition and State Fair in Sacramento.
